Utah statutes.
10-3b-301.   Municipal government powers vested in a six-member council.

The powers of municipal government in a municipality operating under the six-member council form of government are vested in a council consisting of six members, one of which is a mayor.



Enacted by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

